Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 24 Business Names

§ 17-24-101.
Business entity name; limited rights.

The authorization granted under this title by the secretary of state to file articles of incorporation, a certificate of limited partnership, articles of organization, articles of formation, a certificate of trust or other similar document authorizing the transaction of business in this state under a corporate, limited partnership, limited liability company, statutory trust, statutory foundation or other business entity name or to reserve a name does not:

Abrogate or limit the law governing unfair competition or unfair trade practices;

Derogate from the common law the principles of equity or the statutes of this state or of the United States with respect to the right to acquire and protect names and trademarks; or

Create an exclusive right in geographic or generic terms contained within a name.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 80, § 1; 2019 ch. 190, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), added “articles of formation” following “articles of organization,” and “statutory foundation” following “statutory trust.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.